Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1701
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-1701 to 38-1725 shall be known and may be cited as the Massage Therapy Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 608;

Laws 2019, LB244, § 1.